Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.065

Exclusive instruction in agriculture.

Work and instruction in agriculture in all its branches and subdivisions shall be offered and taught in Washington State University exclusively.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.065. Prior: 1917 c 10 s 6; RRS s 4537. Formerly RCW 28.80.026; 28.76.070, part.]